src/scripts/Czech/numbers.foma
# Copyright (C) 2023 Darko Milosevic <daremc86@gmail.com>, Zvonimir Stanecic

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define ProcNumChar [ %-:mínus |
%€: euro |
%+: plus |
%.: tečka |
%,: čárka ] ;

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;
define UnformattedNumber [ Digit Digit^<16];
define Number  UnformattedNumber;

define Insertzeros 
[%0] -> nula || [ .#. | [.#. %0+]] _ ;

define InsertThousands 
[..] -> tisíc || Digit _ Digit^3 .#.  ;

define InsertMillions 
[..] -> miliónů || Digit _ Digit^3 tisíc;

define InsertBillions 
[..] -> miliárd || Digit _ Digit^3 miliónů;

define InsertTrillions 
[..] -> biliónů || Digit _ Digit^3 miliárd;

define RemoveSkippedParts 
%0 %0 %0 [tisíc|miliónů|miliárd|biliónů] -> 0 ;

define Units %0:0|1:jedna|2:dva|3:tři|4:čtyři|5:pět|6:šest|7:sedum|8:osum|9:devět;

define Teens 1:0 [%0:deset|1:jedenáct|2:dvanáct|3:třináct|4:čtrnáct|5:patnáct|6:šestnáct|7:sedmnáct|8:osmnáct|9:devatenáct];

define Tens %0:0|2:dvacet|3:třicet|4:čtyřicet|5:padesát|6:šedesát|7:sedmdesát|8:osmdesát|9:devadesát;

define Hundreds %0:0|1:sto|2:dvěstě|3:třista|4:čtyřista|5:pětset|6:šestset|7:sedmset|8:osmset|9:devětset;

define UpToThousand %0:nula .P. [[(Hundreds) Teens] | [((Hundreds) Tens) Units]];

define DigitsToWords 
UpToThousand @->;

define FixCase 
tisíc:tisíc|miliónů:milión|miliárd:miliárda|biliónů:bilión -> || jedna _ ,, 
tisíc:tisíce|miliónů:milióny|miliárd:miliárdy|bilión:bilióny -> || dva|tři|čtyři _  ;

define ReplaceDva 
dva -> dvě || ^ _ miliárdy ;

define ReplaceJedna 
jedna -> jeden || ^ _ bilión ,, 
jedna -> jeden || ^ _ milión ;


define Fix31Tys 
tisíc:tisíc|
miliónů:miliónů|
miliárd:miliárd|
biliónů:biliónů -> || 
[dvacet|třicet|čtyřicet|padesát|
šedesát|sedmdesát|osmdesát|devadesát|
sto|dvěstě|třista|čtyřista|pětset|šestset|
sedmset|osmset|devětset] jedna _ ;

define Fix32Tys 
tisíce:tisíc|
milióny:miliónů|
miliárdy:miliárd|
bilióny:biliónů -> || 
[dvacet|třicet|čtyřicet|padesát|
šedesát|sedmdesát|osmdesát|devadesát|
sto|dvěstě|třista|čtyřista|pětset|šestset|
sedmset|osmset|devětset] dva _ ;

define Fix33Tys 
tisíce:tisíc|
milióny:miliónů|
miliárdy:miliárd|
bilióny:biliónů -> || 
[dvacet|třicet|čtyřicet|padesát|
šedesát|sedmdesát|osmdesát|devadesát|
sto|dvěstě|třista|čtyřista|pětset|šestset|
sedmset|osmset|devětset] tři _ ;

define Fix34Tys 
tisíce:tisíc|
milióny:miliónů|
miliárdy:miliárd|
bilióny:biliónů -> || 
[dvacet|třicet|čtyřicet|padesát|
šedesát|sedmdesát|osmdesát|devadesát|
sto|dvěstě|třista|čtyřista|pětset|šestset|
sedmset|osmset|devětset] čtyři _ ;

define RemoveOne 
jedna -> 0 || .#. | GroupName _ tisíc,, 
jeden -> 0 || .#. | GroupName _ milión,, 
jedna -> 0 || .#.  | GroupName _ miliárda,, 
jeden -> 0 || .#. | GroupName _ bilión ; 

define ProcNumber Number .o. 
Insertzeros .o. 
InsertThousands .o. 
InsertMillions .o. 
InsertBillions .o. 
InsertTrillions .o. 
RemoveSkippedParts .o. 
DigitsToWords .o. 
FixCase .o. 
ReplaceDva .o. 
ReplaceJedna .o. 
RemoveOne .o.
Fix31Tys  .o.
Fix32Tys  .o.
Fix33Tys  .o.
Fix34Tys  ;

regex ProcNumChar | ProcNumber;
